sl-SI: Debelina vrvice mreže: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Drugo
sv: Tjocklek på nätgarn: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Övrigt
fi: Verkon langan paksuus: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Muu
fr: Calibre du fil de filet: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Autre
ro-RO: Grosimea sforii plasei: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Altele
da: Garn- eller snoretykkelse i net: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Andet
ru: Калибр нити сетки: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Другое
en: Net twine gauge: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Other
de: Stärke des Netzgarns: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Sonstiges
vi: Độ dày dây lưới: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Khác
es: Calibre del hilo de la red: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Otro
ja: ネット糸ゲージ: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; その他
zh-CN: 网线规格: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; 其他
cs: Měřidlo síťového provázku: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Ostatní
tr: Ağ ipi ölçüsü: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Diğer
hu: Hálózsinór vastagsága: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Egyéb
bg-BG: Дебелина на нишката на мрежата: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Друго
nl: Net touw dikte: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Anders
ko: 그물끈 게이지: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; 기타
el: Μετρητής καθαρού νήματος: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Άλλο
sk-SK: Hrubka sieťoviny: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Iné
hr-HR: Mjerač neto konopca: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Ostalo
pl: Grubość sznurka siatki: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Inne
lt-LT: Tinklo virvutės storis: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Kita
pt-BR: Rede calibre do cordão: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Outro
nb: Tykkelse på nettgarn: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Annet
pt-PT: bitola da corda da rede: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Outro
zh-TW: 網線線規: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; 其他
it: Calibro del filo della rete: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; Altro
th: เกจวัดเชือกตาข่าย: 12; 18; 21; 24; 27; 30; 36; 42; 48; 60; 72; 84; 96; อื่นๆ